Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.047

Itinerant vendor's or peddler's registration—Fee—Penalties—Ephedrine/pseudoephedrine/phenylpropanolamine.

(1) Any itinerant vendor or any peddler of any nonprescription drug or preparation for the treatment of disease or injury, shall pay a registration fee determined by the secretary on a date to be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The department may issue a registration to such vendor on an approved application made to the department.

(2) Any itinerant vendor or peddler who shall vend or sell, or offer to sell to the public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without having registered to do so as provided in this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell shall constitute a separate offense.

(3) In event the registration fee remains unpaid on the date due, no renewal or new registration shall be issued except upon compliance with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. This registration shall not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled substances.

(4) An itinerant vendor may purchase products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers only from a wholesaler licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.045. The commission shall issue a warning to an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the vendor for a subsequent violation.

(5) An itinerant vendor who has purchased products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the following requirements:

(a) The itinerant vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed 10 percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through February, the vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed 20 percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales" means total dollars paid by buyers.

(b) The itinerant vendor shall maintain inventory records of the receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and manner required by the commission. The records must be available for inspection by the commission or any law enforcement agency and must be maintained for two years. The commission may suspend or revoke the registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product to the wholesaler or distributor.

[ 2024 c 121 s 36; 2013 c 19 s 10; 2005 c 388 s 7; 2004 c 52 s 4; 2003 c 53 s 134; 1996 c 191 s 46; 1991 c 229 s 6; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 418; 1984 c 153 s 8; 1979 c 90 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 201 s 4; 1963 c 38 s 5; 1949 c 153 s 3; 1935 c 98 s 7; 1899 c 121 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10141. Formerly RCW 18.60.010 through 18.60.030.]

NOTES:

Finding—Effective dates—Severability—2005 c 388: See notes following RCW 69.43.105.

Finding—Severability—Effective date—2004 c 52: See notes following RCW 18.64.044.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 201: See note following RCW 18.64.040.